California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
If the owner delivers any grain and seed to a grain and seed cleaner for cleaning, and desires to have the cleanings from the grain and seed kept for him, he shall make written request to the grain and seed cleaner to segregate and hold all cleanings which result from the cleaning of the grain and seed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55253.

If a request is made by the owner, the cleaner shall sack or otherwise segregate the cleanings and give written notice to the owner when the cleaning is completed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55254.

If the cleanings are not removed from the cleaning plant within five days after the mailing of the written notification to the owner, as provided in Section 55253, or five days from the date of receiving authorization to move the cleanings if such authorization is required by Section 7571, the grain and seed cleaner may dispose of the cleanings in such manner as is provided by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55255.

If no disposition of the cleanings is provided for by law and authorization to move the cleanings if required by Section 7571 is received as provided in Section 55254, the grain and seed cleaner may dispose of the cleanings by sale or otherwise and shall pay the grower the net receipts received from such sale after deducting reasonable expenses of the sale and satisfying any claims which he may have against such cleanings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Processors of Farm Products [55401. - 55922.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [55401. - 55409.]

55401.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55402.

“Agent” means any person that on behalf of any processor contracts for or solicits any farm product from a producer of the farm product, or that negotiates the purchase of any farm product on behalf of any processor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55402.3.

“Cash” means coin or currency of the United States, and does not include a check or money order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

55402.5.

“Cash buying processor” means any person who is engaged in the business of processing or manufacturing any farm product; who obtains from the producer of any farm product, title to, or possession or control of the farm product; and who buys or agrees to buy any farm product, by cash payment of the full agreed price of such product to the producer at the time of obtaining possession or control or at the time of contracting for title to, or possession or control of any farm product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

55403.

“Farm product” includes every agricultural, horticultural, viticultural, or vegetable product of the soil, honey and beeswax, oilseeds, poultry, poultry product, livestock product, and livestock for immediate slaughter. It does not include timber or any timber product, milk or any milk product, any aquacultural product, or cattle sold to any person who is bonded under the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 181, et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55404.

“Lender” includes any person that advances new value to a processor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55404.5.

“Licensee” means any person licensed under the provisions of this chapter as a processor or cash buying processor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

55405.

“New value” includes any new advance or loan, whether in money or other property, which is made by a lender to a processor. It does not, however, include any extension or renewal of any existing obligation of the processor, nor any obligation which is substituted for such existing obligation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55406.

“Packout basis” means that payment for the farm product is based on the grade or quality of the finished product, as determined at the completion of the processing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55407.

“Processor” means any person that is engaged in the business of processing or manufacturing any farm product, that solicits, buys, contracts to buy, or otherwise takes title to, or possession or control of, any farm product from the producer of the farm product for the purpose of processing or manufacturing it and selling, reselling, or redelivering it in any dried, canned, extracted, fermented, distilled, frozen, eviscerated, or other preserved or processed form. It does not, however, include any retail merchant that has a fixed or established place of business in this state and does not sell at wholesale any farm product which is processed or manufactured by him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

55408.

“Producer” means any person that is engaged in the business of growing or producing any farm product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55409.

Juice or must used for wine which, as a condition of sale, is required to be pressed or crushed from grapes in the field or at a facility not owned by the purchasing vintner, is a farm product for purposes of this chapter. Juice or must which was not required to be pressed or crushed from grapes as a condition of a sale, and which is stored for the account of the producer who grew the grapes, is not a farm product when it is sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [55431. - 55439.]

55431.

The marketing of agricultural commodities within this state is hereby declared to be affected with the public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55432.

The director may publish in pamphlet form as often as he thinks necessary a list of processors that are licensed pursuant to this chapter, together with all necessary regulations which concern the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55433.

(a) Any money in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund that was derived pursuant to this chapter, or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56101), may be expended for the administration and enforcement of these chapters and Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56701), notwithstanding any other law that limits the expenditure of any such money to the specific purposes or to the administration or enforcement of each of the chapters separately.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and Section 221, only moneys derived from the fees collected pursuant to Sections 55861, 55863, 56571, and 56574 may be used for purposes of Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56701).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 2.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

55435.

No provisions in any bond which is given pursuant to any provision of this chapter which attempts by contract to shorten the period which is prescribed for the commencement of an action on the bond by Section 337 of the Code of Civil Procedure, is valid if such provision attempts to limit the time for commencement of action on the bond to a shorter period than six months from the termination of the 35-day period which is covered by such bond.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55435.5.

(a) Except pursuant to an exemption granted by the department, no person licensed under this chapter shall employ as an agent any person who meets any of the following criteria:

(1) Whose license has been revoked, or is currently suspended.

(2) Who has committed any one flagrant or repeated violations of this chapter or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56101).

(3) Who failed to pay a producer’s claims for which the person, or, where the person controlled the decision to pay, the person’s employer, was liable, and which arose out of the conduct of a business licensed, or required to be licensed, under this chapter or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56101).

(4) Who has been convicted of a crime that includes as one of its elements the financial victimization of another person.

(b) The department may approve the employment of any person covered under subdivision (a), if the licensee furnishes and maintains a surety bond in the form and amount satisfactory to the department, but which shall not be less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), as assurance that the licensee’s business will be conducted in accordance with this chapter and that the licensee will pay all amounts due California producers. The department may approve employment without a surety bond after the expiration of four years from the effective date of the applicable disciplinary order. The department, based on changes in the nature and volume of business conducted by the licensee, may require an increase or authorize a reduction in the amount of the bond, but in no case shall the bond be reduced below ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A licensee who is notified by the department to provide a bond in an increased amount shall do so within a reasonable time to be specified by the department, and if the licensee fails to do so, the approval of employment shall automatically terminate. The department may suspend or revoke the license of any licensee who, after the date given in the notice, continues to employ any person in violation of this section.

(c) The department may obtain access to a licensee’s or agent’s criminal record during the course of a licensing investigation opened for other reasons or if the department is presented with a reasonable basis to believe an agent or licensee satisfies any of the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a). The Department of Justice shall furnish criminal record information to the department at the department’s request. If the information thereby obtained reveals a conviction for a crime that includes as one of its elements the financial victimization of another person, the department shall bring this to the attention of the licensee and the agent by a written notice. This written notice shall set out the charges against the licensee or agent, prohibit employment or revoke or deny the license effective if and when any rights to an administrative hearing have been exhausted, and set out the licensee’s or agent’s rights under this section.

(d) The department may grant an exemption on presentation of substantial, clear, and convincing evidence to support a reasonable belief as to any of the following:

(1) There has been a mistake of fact or identity.

(2) The present role as an agent provides no opportunity for a repeat of the prior behavior.

(3) The person has been rehabilitated.

All submissions shall be authenticated and verified under penalty of perjury. Unless the licensee or agent can prove one of these three elements by substantial, clear, and convincing evidence, the department shall deny the request for exemption.

(e) (1) A licensee or agent who has been identified by the department as satisfying any of the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) and who has not been granted an exemption by the department shall be afforded a hearing upon the licensee’s or agent’s request under this chapter. The licensee or agent shall not have a right of hearing if the department did not notify the employer or deny an exemption.

(2) At the hearing, the department shall have the burden to prove that any of the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) are satisfied by a preponderance of the evidence. It shall be the licensee’s or agent’s burden to prove rehabilitation by substantial, clear, and convincing evidence.

(3) In the case of a criminal conviction, “convicted of a crime” includes a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. Any action that the department is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, notwithstanding a subsequent order pursuant to Sections 1203.4 and 1203.4a of the Penal Code permitting the person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment. For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, the record of a conviction, or a copy thereof certified by the clerk of the court or by a judge of the court in which the conviction occurred, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.

(4) For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, a certified copy of a decision and order or minutes of the court in which a finding is made concerning any of the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a), is prima facie evidence of the truth of the charge and collateral estoppel applies.

(f) The documents and information procured pursuant to this section shall be considered the records of a consumer and shall not be construed to be a public record. The documents and information shall remain confidential, except in actions brought by the department to enforce this division, or as a result of the issuance of a subpoena in accordance with Section 1985.4 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The unauthorized release of the documents received from the Department of Justice or the information contained in those documents is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 2.5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55436.

Civil suits and criminal prosecutions which arise by virtue of any provision of this chapter may be commenced and tried in any of the following:

(a) The county where the products were received by the processor.

(b) The county in which the principal place of business of such processor is located.

(c) The county in which the violation of this chapter occurred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55437.

The rights, remedies, and penalties which are provided for in this chapter are in addition to any other rights, remedies, or penalties which are provided for by law, and any acts or parts of acts in conflict therewith are hereby repealed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55438.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 307) of the Code of Civil Procedure are applicable to, and constitute the rules of practice in, the proceedings which are mentioned in this chapter, and the provisions of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure relative to new trials and appeals, except insofar as they are inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, apply to the proceedings which are mentioned in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55439.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of this chapter is for any reason adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of this chapter, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of this chapter which is directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment is rendered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exceptions [55461. - 55462.]

55461.

This chapter does not apply to or include any nonprofit cooperative association which is organized and operating pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) or pursuant to similiar laws of any other states, the District of Columbia, or the United States. This chapter also does not apply to the agents of these organizations in the performance of their duties. This chapter does apply to the activities of the organization, or agent, which involve the handling or dealing in any farm product of nonmembers of the organization, and activities of such an organization, or agent, which involve acting as a producer bargaining association asserting the lien rights of its members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1109, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

55462.

For the purposes of trading in cattle, this chapter does not apply to or include any person who is bonded under the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 181, et seq.) who is engaged in the business of buying or selling cattle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Agent’s License [55481. - 55493.]

55481.

A person shall not act as an agent unless such person has first obtained a license as provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55482.

Every person, before acting as an agent, shall file an application with the director for a license to so act. The application shall be accompanied by the application fee which is prescribed by Article 16 (commencing with Section 55861) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55483.

(a) Each application shall include all of the following:

(1) Such information as the department may consider proper or necessary.

(2) The name and address of the applicant.

(3) The name and address of the processor that is represented or sought to be represented by the agent.

(4) The written endorsement or nomination of the processor.

(5) A release authorizing the department, during consideration of the application and for the duration of licensure, to have access to and obtain financial information from both of the following:

(A) The applicant’s files with credit reporting agencies.

(B) The applicant’s files with banks, savings and loan associations, or any other financial institutions with whom the applicant has done business in the past or with whom the applicant intends to do business during the year of licensure.

(6) A notice signed by the applicant that the department may obtain criminal record information during the course of a licensing investigation or upon presentation with a reasonable basis to believe the licensee has been convicted of a crime. An applicant whose application is incomplete shall be given written notice that a failure to complete it within 30 calendar days shall result in denial of the application.

(b) The documents and information procured pursuant to this section shall be considered the records of a consumer and shall not be construed to be a public record. The documents and information shall remain confidential, except in actions brought by the department to enforce this division, or as a result of the issuance of a subpoena in accordance with Section 1985.4 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The unauthorized release of the documents received from the Department of Justice or the information contained in those documents is a misdemeanor.

(c) The department shall adopt regulations that specify the proper and necessary information and supporting documentation the department requires for an application to be considered complete.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 3.5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55484.

The department shall accept or deny an application within 90 calendar days of receipt of a completed application. The department may deny, condition, suspend, or revoke a license issued pursuant to this chapter upon any of the following grounds and in the manner provided in this chapter:

(a) Upon one flagrant violation, as determined by the department, or upon repeated violations, by the holder or applicant, of any one or combination of the sections of this division or under any one or combination of the regulations promulgated by the department under the authority of this division.

(b) Upon one flagrant violation, as determined by the department, or upon repeated violations, by a holder’s or applicant’s agent, employee, or contractor, or of an organization or entity in which the holder or applicant holds a significant financial interest, of any one or combination of the sections of this division or any one or combination of the regulations promulgated under this division under circumstances where the holder or applicant knew or should have known and failed to take reasonable measures to prevent the violation or failed to report the violation to the department upon learning of the violation.

(c) On the conviction of the holder or applicant of a crime that includes as one of its elements the financial victimization of another person. However, if the licensee was licensed prior to January 1, 1998, and the department knew of, or was on notice of, the conviction, that conviction may not form the basis of a discipline under this subdivision.

(d) On the grounds of a false or misleading statement by a holder or applicant that the holder or applicant knew or should have known to be false or misleading, directed to any official of any government concerning the scope of any indicia of authority, including, but not limited to, the holder’s or applicant’s license associated with the holder’s or applicant’s business, the standards under which the indicia was authorized, the contents of the application for licensure, or the holder’s or applicant’s relationship to the indicia.

(e) On the grounds that a holder or applicant, or a holder’s or applicant’s agency, employee, or contractor, or an organization or entity in which a holder or applicant holds a significant financial interest, deceived a grower in any material matter. Deception, for purposes of this subdivision, does not require scienter, but requires active misrepresentation where the actor knew the representation to be false or where the actor should have known, with due consideration, that he or she did not know whether or not the representation was true or false.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55484.5.

(a) The Legislature finds there to be a substantial nexus between the conduct specified in Section 55484 and an applicant’s or holder’s fitness for licensure.

(b) The department shall not dismiss an action where a violation, however minor, has been established. The department shall not dismiss an action because the applicant or holder establishes factors in mitigation.

(c) However, the department may impose discipline other than denial or revocation of the license. As an alternative to revocation of a license, the department may stay a revocation subject to terms for a period of probation. As an alternative to denial the department may issue a license subject to conditions. Terms of probation or terms of conditional licensure may include, but are not limited to, a requirement of restitution, payment for extra audits, immediate revocation on a new violation, or any other terms that respond to the particular violations or circumstances found.

(d) Once a finding of a violation has been made, the department may consider the following factors in assessing the appropriate level of discipline:

(1) The relative isolation or infrequency of the conduct.

(2) Whether the conduct was a part of a pattern or practice.

(3) Whether the actor had been warned before.

(4) Whether the actor considered the consequences of the conduct.

(5) Whether the actor reasonably relied on others.

(6) The severity of the consequences.

(7) The mens rea of the actor.

(8) In the case of a criminal conviction, evidence of rehabilitation.

(9) The total licensing history.

(e) The following factors shall not be considered in assessing the appropriate level of discipline:

(1) The social or economic contributions of the applicant or holder.

(2) General testimonials as to good character and worthiness to be licensed.

(3) Economic hardship on the licensee.

(4) “Mercy of the court” pleas in connection with criminal convictions, pattern or practice violations, or deception.

(5) In the case of a felony criminal conviction, the department shall not consider rehabilitation unless the convicted person has a valid certificate of rehabilitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55484.75.

(a) If an application for a license indicates, or the department determines during the application review process, that the applicant was issued a license that was revoked within the preceding two years, the department shall cease any further review of the application until two years have elapsed from the date of the revocation. The cessation of review shall not constitute a denial of the application for the purposes of this chapter, or any other provision of law.

(b) If an application for a license indicates, or the department determines during the application review process, that the applicant had previously applied for a license and the application was denied within the last year, the department shall cease further review of the application until 30 days have elapsed from the date of the notification of the denial or from the effective date of the decision and order of the department upholding a denial. The cessation of review shall not constitute a denial of the new applicant for purposes of this chapter, or any other provision of law.

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) or (b) prohibits the department from taking into account the basis for denial or revocation in considering any new application subsequent to the elapse of the applicable period of prohibition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

55485.

The applicant shall satisfy the department of the applicant’s character, responsibility, and good faith in seeking to carry on the business that is stated in the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55485.5.

A license is forfeited by operation of law prior to its expiration date when one of the following occurs:

(a) The holder surrenders the license to the department.

(b) The holder dies.

(c) The partnership holder dissolves.

(d) The holder of a significant financial interest in a corporation transfers his or her interest to another person or entity, regardless of relationship.

(e) The holder files for bankruptcy under provisions other than those permitting and governing reorganization under bankruptcy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55485.75.

(a) The withdrawal of an application for a license after it has been filed with the department does not deprive the department of its authority to institute or continue a proceeding against the applicant or to enter an order denying the license, unless the department consents in writing to such a withdrawal.

(b) The expiration or forfeiture by operation of law of a license, or its forfeiture or cancellation by order of the department or by order of a court of law, or its surrender without the written consent of the department, does not deprive the department of its authority to institute or continue a disciplinary proceeding against the holder upon any ground provided by law or to enter an order revoking the license or otherwise taking disciplinary action against the holder.

(c) Any action brought by the department against an applicant or holder does not abate by reason of the sale or other transfer of ownership of the business that is a party to the action, except with the written consent of the department.

(d) Nothing in this division or in any other provision of this code deprives the department of the authority to settle or adjudicate a disposition of a case other than by revocation or denial. The department or the department’s designee may compromise with the applicant or holder in a written stipulation and order. The department may, following a hearing, order probation on terms and conditions as determined by the department. The authority conferred by this subdivision shall include, but not be limited to, the authority to order payment of amounts determined owing, the authority to dismiss an action on the department’s own initiative, the authority to order administrative penalties, the authority to order a respondent to pay for heightened audit scrutiny, the authority to suspend a license for a period of years, or any combination of remedies other than final revocation or denial of a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55488.

(a) The department shall notify the applicant or holder in writing of the department’s decision to bring charges to deny or revoke a license.

(1) The notice shall inform the applicant or holder of the charges against him or her, of the department’s proposed disciplinary action, and of his or her rights under this chapter.

(2) The notice shall be served by certified mail to the applicant’s or holder’s last known address.

(3) The notice shall be mailed to the applicant or holder at least 30 calendar days in advance of the impending action.

(b) The department’s proposed action shall become final unless the applicant or holder appeals prior to the end of the notice period by submitting a notice of defense to the department in a form specified by the department. The notice shall be transmitted to the department in a form that is written, including, but not limited to, by facsimile.

(c) If the department receives a timely notice of defense, the department shall schedule a hearing within 90 calendar days of receipt of the notice of defense. Pending the final decision at the conclusion of the hearing, a revocation shall be stayed.

(d) Proceedings for the revocation or denial of a license issued under this chapter shall be conducted by hearing officers appointed for that purpose by the department. The department may elect to use hearing officers employed by the Office of Administrative Hearings. The hearing officers shall be independent of the Market Enforcement Bureau, but may be employees of the department. The hearing officers shall be qualified administrative law judges.

(e) Proceedings shall be conducted generally in accordance with the provisions of Chapters 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. However, proceedings need not conform strictly to any “rules of court” adopted as regulations by the Office of Administrative Hearings to guide the conduct of hearings conducted by the Office of Administrative Hearings. The department has all power granted by Chapters 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(1) The sole parties to the proceedings shall be the department and the applicant or holder. Third party intervention shall not be permitted. The disputes, claims, and interests of third parties shall not be within the jurisdiction of the proceedings. However, nothing in this paragraph prohibits any interested party from submitting an amicus brief if the hearing officer requests written briefs.

(2) The validity of a department regulation or order shall not be within jurisdiction of the proceedings.

(3) Law and motion matters shall be handled by the assigned hearing officer.

(4) The hearing officer may not enter into settlement discussions.

(5) The hearing officer may not issue sanctions.

(f) In all proceedings conducted in accordance with this section, the standard of proof to be applied is the preponderance of the evidence. When the department seeks to revoke an existing license, the department shall have the burden of proof and the burden of producing evidence.

(g) Decisions following a hearing shall be adopted by the department or the department’s designee and become final unless remanded for reconsideration or alternated in accordance with Chapters 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(h) The department shall maintain a library of decisions that shall be made available to any person, including the parties to administrative actions during discovery.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55491.

The director may issue to each agent a separate license card for each processor represented by the agent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55492.

Any agent that displays a void or expired license card is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55493.

Each agent shall show his license upon the request of any interested person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Processor’s License [55521. - 55530.]

55521.

A person shall not act as a processor or a cash buying processor unless he has first obtained a license as provided in this chapter or in Section 56574.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

55522.

Every person, before acting as a processor or a cash buying processor, shall file an application with the director for a license to so act. The application, unless it is an application for a conjunctive processor’s license pursuant to Section 56574, shall be accompanied by the application fee which is prescribed by Article 16 (commencing with Section 55861) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

55522.5.

(a) It is unlawful for a licensee that has changed its legal entity to do any of the following: 

(1) Continue to operate after the change. 

(2) Purchase or handle any farm product from a person who had a farm product contract with the former licensee at the time of the change in entity without notifying that person, in writing, of the change in entity. 

(3) Use any invoice, contract, or other document associated with the purchase, consignment, or brokerage of any farm product that identifies the former licensee unless the new entity is conspicuously identified on the same invoice, contract, or other document as the entity responsible for the transaction. 

(b) The new entity shall notify the director in writing of the change in legal entity within 15 days of the change. The new legal entity shall, before it conducts business that requires a license, obtain a new license for the business. 

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if a licensee conducts business without a new license as a result of a change of legal entity, it may, within 120 days of the change, upon a showing of no substantial change in financial resources and liabilities, petition the director to grant a new license retroactive to the first day of the month during which the change occurred, and the director may grant the license with retroactive effect upon a finding that doing so would be consistent with the purposes of this chapter. Upon granting the petition, the director shall (1) require the licensee to pay an additional fee in an amount that will cover the expenses of the department in the matter, but not to exceed the fee for a new license, (2) place conditions on the license that are consistent with the purposes of this chapter as the director deems appropriate, and (3) require the licensee to pay an amount, for deposit in the Farm Products Trust Fund, equal to the amount that would have been required had the license been obtained in accordance with subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 733, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

55522.6.

(a) If the Secretary of State suspends the corporate status of any licensee or if the corporate status is forfeited, the license is revoked by operation of law. The former licensee shall provide written notice of the suspension or forfeiture to the director, and to each person with whom it has a farm product contract, within 15 days of the date the Secretary of State mails the notice of suspension or forfeiture. 

(b) The former licensee, may, upon a showing of no substantial change in financial resources and liabilities, and within 90 days of the suspension or forfeiture of corporate status, petition the director for an order to reissue its license formerly held under this chapter. If the corporate status has been reinstated by the Secretary of State, the director may reissue the license if the director finds that doing so would be consistent with the purposes of this chapter. As a condition to reissuing the license, the director may (1) require the former licensee to undertake such financial guarantees, including the filing and maintaining bonds, as the director deems necessary to protect the interests of contracting parties, and (2) impose conditions on the license that are consistent with the purposes of this chapter as the director deems appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 733, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

55523.

(a) Each application shall state all of the following:

(1) The full name of the applicant.

(2) If the applicant is a firm, exchange, association, or corporation, the full name of each member of the firm or the names of the officers of the exchange, association, or corporation.

(3) The principal business address of the applicant in this state.

(4) The name of every person who is authorized to receive and accept service of summons for the applicant.

(5) A release authorizing the department, during consideration of the application and for the duration of licensure, to have access to and obtain financial information from both of the following:

(A) The applicant’s files with credit reporting agencies.

(B) The applicant’s files with banks, savings and loan associations, or any other financial institutions with whom the applicant has done business in the past or with whom the applicant intends to do business during the year of licensure.
